New York, session 2025-2026, A5761.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 15 of section 201 of the workers' compensation 2 law, as added by section 2 of part SS of chapter 54 of the laws of 2016, 3 is amended to read as follows: 4 15. "Family leave" shall mean any leave taken by an employee from 5 work: (a) to participate in providing care, including physical or 6 psychological care, for a family member of the employee made necessary 7 by a serious health condition of the family member; [or] (b) to bond 8 with the employee's child during the first twelve months after the 9 child's birth, or the first twelve months after the placement of the 10 child for adoption or foster care with the employee; [or] (c) to recover 11 after a stillbirth; (d) to recover after a miscarriage; (e) to recover 12 after an abortion; or (f) because of any qualifying exigency as inter- 13 preted under the family and medical leave act, 29 U.S.C.S § 14 2612(a)(1)(e) and 29 C.F.R. S.825.126(a)(1)-(8), arising out of the fact 15 that the spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent of the employee is 16 on active duty (or has been notified of an impending call or order to 17 active duty) in the armed forces of the United States. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 19 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10036-01-5